Oklahoma, session 2025, SB800.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 24-156, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 451, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 24-156), is amended to read as follows:


Section 24-156. A. This act shall be known and may be cited as


the “Chase Morris Sudden Cardiac Arrest Prevention Act”.


B. As used in the Chase Morris Sudden Cardiac Arrest Prevention


Act, “athletic activity” means any sport sanctioned and offered in


grades seven through twelve by a school district.



Req. No. 764 Page 1


C. The State Department of Health and the State Department of


Education shall jointly develop and post on their publicly


accessible websites guidelines and other relevant materials to


inform and educate students participating in or desiring to


participate in an athletic activity, their parents, and their


coaches about the nature and warning signs of sudden cardiac arrest


including the risks associated with continuing to play or practice


after experiencing one or more symptoms of sudden cardiac arrest


including unexplained fainting, difficulty breathing, chest pains,


dizziness, and abnormal racing heart rate. In developing the


guidelines and materials, the State Department of Health and the


State Department of Education may utilize existing materials


developed by other entities or organizations.


D. A student participating in or desiring to participate in an


athletic activity and the student’s parent or guardian shall, each


school year and prior to participation by the student in an athletic


activity, sign and return to the student’s school an acknowledgement


of receipt and review of a sudden cardiac arrest symptoms and


warning signs information sheet jointly developed by the State


Department of Health and the State Department of Education.


E. A school may hold an informational meeting prior to the


start of each athletic season for all ages of competitors regarding


the symptoms and warning signs of sudden cardiac arrest. In


addition to students, parents, coaches, and other school officials,

Req. No. 764 Page 2


informational meetings may include physicians, pediatric


cardiologists, and athletic trainers.


F. A student who collapses or faints without a concurrent head


injury while participating in an athletic activity shall be removed


by the coach from participation at that time.


G. A student removed or prevented from participating in an


athletic activity pursuant to subsection F of this section shall not


return to participation until the student is evaluated and cleared


for return to participation in writing by a health care provider as


defined in Section 3090.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


H. Once each year, a coach of an athletic activity, school


nurses, and athletic trainers shall complete:


1. The sudden cardiac arrest training course offered by a


provider approved by the State Department of Health; and


2. Training in first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and


use of an automated external defibrillator. The training shall


follow guidelines set by a nationally recognized, guidelines-based


organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care.


A coach of an athletic activity shall not coach the athletic


activity until the coach completes the training course required


under this subsection.


I. A coach of an athletic activity and athletic trainers shall


complete annual training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation. A coach


of an athletic activity shall not coach the athletic activity until

Req. No. 764 Page 3


he or she completes the training required by this subsection. Once


every two (2) years, school nurses shall complete training in


cardiopulmonary resuscitation.


J. Each public school in this state shall develop a sudden


cardiac emergency response plan. The plan shall be formulated by a


school site administrator and presented to the school district board


of education. The plan shall:


1. Establish and provide for membership of a sudden cardiac


emergency response team for each school site. Each team shall


include a school site administrator;


2. Activate the team in response to a sudden cardiac arrest;


3. Implement automated external defibrillator (AED) placement


and routine maintenance within the school as needed and dictated by


the plan and in accordance with guidelines set by a nationally


recognized, guidelines-based organization focused on emergency


cardiovascular care. The plan shall provide for implementation of


clearly marked and easily accessible AED placement;


4. Provide for communication and dissemination of the plan


throughout the school campus;


5. Require the response team to practice the plan by conducting


periodic drills;


6. Provide for coordination with emergency medical service


providers that serve the area in which the school is located;



Req. No. 764 Page 4


7. Address athletic events and athletic facilities at each


middle school and high school site provided:


a. an AED shall be placed at each athletic venue or be


accessible within one (1) to three (3) minutes of each


venue where athletic practices or competitions are


held, or


b. a mobile AED device shall be on the premises in


accordance with guidelines set by a nationally


recognized, guidelines-based organization focused on


emergency cardiovascular care;


8. Provide for appropriate school staff to be trained in first


aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the use of an AED in


accordance with guidelines set by a nationally recognized,


guidelines-based organization focused on emergency cardiovascular


care. The plan shall stipulate the appropriate staff to receive


training which shall include, but not be limited to, athletic


coaches, school nurses, and athletic trainers; and


9. Be reviewed by the school district board of education and


sudden cardiac emergency response team members and updated annually.


J. K. The sponsors of youth athletic activities not associated


with a school are encouraged to follow the guidance stated in the


Chase Morris Sudden Cardiac Arrest Prevention Act.


K. L. Nothing in the Chase Morris Sudden Cardiac Arrest


Prevention Act shall be construed to create, establish, expand,

Req. No. 764 Page 5


reduce, contract, or eliminate any civil liability on the part of


any school or school employee.


L. M. The State Board of Health and the State Board of


Education shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of the


Chase Morris Sudden Cardiac Arrest Prevention Act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-764 EB 1/19/2025 5:43:35 AM

























Req. No. 764 Page 6